Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3309
Board; compensation and expenses.

The compensation and expenses of the members of the board and its employees may be agreed upon among such members and the executor or administrator and if they cannot agree shall be fixed by the probate court of the state determined by the board to be the domicile of the decedent. The amounts so agreed upon or fixed shall be deemed an administration expense and shall be payable by the executor or administrator.

Laws 1976, LB 584, § 9.